Utah statutes.
78B-15-609.   Limitation -- Child having declarant father.

(1)  If a child has a declarant father, a signatory to the declaration of paternity or denial of paternity or a support-enforcement agency may commence a proceeding seeking to rescind the declaration or denial or challenge the paternity of the child only within the time allowed under Section 78B-15-306 or 78B-15-307.

(2)  A proceeding under this section is subject to the application of the principles of estoppel established in Section 78B-15-608.

